Utah statutes.
78B-16-108.   Provisions and measures to prevent abduction.
(1)  If a petition is filed under this chapter, the court may enter an order
which must include:
(a)  the basis for the court's exercise of jurisdiction;
(b)  the manner in which notice and opportunity to be heard were given to the
persons entitled to notice of the proceeding;
(c)  a detailed description of each party's custody and visitation rights and
residential arrangements for the child;
(d)  a provision stating that a violation of the order may subject the party
in violation to civil and criminal penalties; and
(e)  identification of the child's country of habitual residence at the time
of the issuance of the order.
(2)  If, at a hearing on a petition under this chapter or on the court's own
motion, the court after reviewing the evidence finds a credible risk of
abduction of the child, the court shall enter an abduction prevention order.
The order must include the provisions required by Subsection (1) and measures
and conditions, including those in Subsections (3), (4), and (5), that are
reasonably calculated to prevent abduction of the child, giving due
consideration to the custody, visitation, and parent-time rights of the
parties.  The court shall consider the age of the child, the potential harm to
the child from an abduction, the legal and practical difficulties of returning
the child to the jurisdiction if abducted, and the reasons for the potential
abduction, including evidence of domestic violence, stalking, or child abuse
or neglect.
(3)  An abduction prevention order may include one or more of the following:
(a)  an imposition of travel restrictions that require that a party traveling
with the child outside a designated geographical area provide the other party
with the following:
(i)  the travel itinerary of the child;
(ii)  a list of physical addresses and telephone numbers at which the child
can be reached at specified times; and
(iii)  copies of all travel documents;
(b)  a prohibition of the respondent directly or indirectly:
(i)  removing the child from this state, the United States, or another
geographic area without permission of the court or the petitioner's written
consent;
(ii)  removing or retaining the child in violation of a child custody
determination;
(iii)  removing the child from school or a child-care or similar facility; or
(iv)  approaching the child at any location other than a site designated for
supervised visitation;
(c)  a requirement that a party to register the order in another state as a
prerequisite to allowing the child to travel to that state;
(d)  with regard to the child's passport:
(i)  a direction that the petitioner place the child's name in the United
States Department of State's Child Passport Issuance Alert Program;
(ii)  a requirement that the respondent surrender to the court or the
petitioner's attorney any United States or foreign passport issued in the
child's name, including a passport issued in the name of both the parent and
the child; and
(iii)  a prohibition upon the respondent from applying on behalf of the child
for a new or replacement passport or visa;
(e)  as a prerequisite to exercising custody, visitation, or parent-time, a
requirement that the respondent provide:
(i)  to the United States Department of State Office of Children's Issues and
the relevant foreign consulate or embassy, an authenticated copy of the order
detailing passport and travel restrictions for the child;
(ii)  to the court:
(A)  proof that the respondent has provided the information in Subsection
(3)(e)(i); and
(B)  an acknowledgment in a record from the relevant foreign consulate or
embassy that no passport application has been made, or passport issued, on
behalf of the child;
(iii)  to the petitioner, proof of registration with the United States Embassy
or other United States diplomatic presence in the destination country and with
the Central Authority for the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of
International Child Abduction, if that convention is in effect between the
United States and the destination country, unless one of the parties objects;
and
(iv)  a written waiver under the Privacy Act, 5 U.S.C. Section 552a, with
respect to any document, application, or other information pertaining to the
child authorizing its disclosure to the court and the petitioner; and
(f)  upon the petitioner's request, a requirement that the respondent obtain
an order from the relevant foreign country containing terms identical to the
child custody determination issued in the United States.
(4)  In an abduction prevention order, the court may impose conditions on the
exercise of custody or visitation that:
(a)  limit visitation or require that visitation with the child by the
respondent be supervised until the court finds that supervision is no longer
necessary and order the respondent to pay the costs of supervision;
(b)  require the respondent to post a bond or provide other security in an
amount sufficient to serve as a financial deterrent to abduction, the proceeds
of which may be used to pay for the reasonable expenses of recovery of the
child, including reasonable attorney fees and costs if there is an abduction;
and
(c)  require the respondent to obtain education on the potentially harmful
effects to the child from abduction.
(5)  To prevent imminent abduction of a child, a court may:
(a)  issue a warrant to take physical custody of the child under Section
78B-16-109 or the law of this state other than this chapter;
(b)  direct the use of law enforcement to take any action reasonably necessary
to locate the child, obtain return of the child, or enforce a custody
determination under this chapter or the law of this state other than this
chapter; or
(c)  grant any other relief allowed under the law of this state other than
this chapter.
(6)  The remedies provided in this chapter are cumulative and do not affect
the availability of other remedies to prevent abduction.
